Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7307.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 6.3
RHODE ISLAND REGULATIONS FROM THE EXECUTIVE IN NEED OF SCRUTINY ACT
42-6.3-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Rhode Island Regulations from the
Executive In Need of Scrutiny Act" or the "RI REINS Act."
42-6.3-2. Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to ensure accountability, transparency, and democratic
oversight of administrative rulemaking by requiring affirmative legislative approval for significant
regulations promulgated by executive agencies, consistent with the separation of powers.
42-6.3-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Agency" means any executive department, board, commission, council, or other
administrative unit of the State of Rhode Island that promulgates regulations under chapter 35 of
title 42.
(2) "Legislative approval resolution" means a bill, joint resolution, or other express
legislative enactment authorizing the major regulation to take effect.

(3) "Major regulation" means any proposed regulation that the agency estimates will have
aggregate implementation or compliance costs of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more over a
two (2) year period measured from the regulation’s effective date.
(4) "Rule" or "regulation" means any agency statement of general applicability having the
force of law, including interpretations, standards, and requirements.
42-6.3-4. Economic impact analysis and certification.
(a) Prior to submitting any proposed regulation to the rulemaking process, the agency shall
prepare an economic impact analysis that quantifies the projected costs of implementation and
compliance over a two (2) year period.
(b) The economic impact analysis shall be submitted to the house and senate committees
on finance for review.
42-6.3-5. Legislative review and approval requirement.
(a) If the economic impact analysis demonstrates that the proposed regulation is a major
regulation, the agency shall not adopt or implement the regulation unless and until the general
assembly passes a legislative approval resolution specifically authorizing the regulation.
(b) The agency shall transmit the proposed major regulation and its economic impact
analysis to the secretary of state, who shall promptly refer it to the general assembly for
consideration.
(c) A major regulation shall remain ineffective and unenforceable until:
(1) A legislative approval resolution has passed both chambers of the general assembly;
and
(2) Such resolution is presented to the governor for signature or otherwise becomes law in
accordance with the Rhode Island constitution.
42-6.3-6. Exceptions.
(a) Emergency regulations necessary for public health, safety, or welfare may be
promulgated without prior legislative approval, but such regulations must be submitted to the
general assembly within thirty (30) days and shall expire after ninety (90) days unless expressly
ratified by the legislature.
(b) Regulations that are expressly required by federal law, federal court order, or state
constitutional mandate are exempt from the requirements of this chapter.
42-6.3-7. Reporting and sunset review.
(a) Agencies shall include with each annual regulatory agenda a summary of all proposed
regulations subject to this chapter, including cost analyses and approval status.
(b) The provisions of this chapter shall be reviewed by the house and senate committees
LC003620 - Page 2 of 4

on judiciary and government oversight every five (5) years.
42-6.3-8. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof, is held invalid, the remainder of
the chapter shall not be affected thereby.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003620
========
LC003620 - Page 3 of 4